Maine, session 132, LD1929.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §2313 is enacted to read:
§2313. Seasonal residential dwellings
1. Definition. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, "seasonal
residential dwelling" means a residential dwelling that is unoccupied for a period exceeding
30 consecutive days in a calendar year and is connected to a public utility, including, but
not limited to, electricity, water or telecommunications.
2. Duties of property owner. An owner of a seasonal residential dwelling shall:
A. Conduct inspections at least annually to identify and address potential hazards such
as overgrown trees or damaged utility lines; and
B. Arrange for services of a caretaker or responsible person during a period when the
seasonal residential dwelling is unoccupied to ensure the timely resolution of public
utility-related issues and shall provide contact information for the caretaker or
responsible person to each public utility to which the seasonal residential dwelling is
connected and to the municipality in which the seasonal residential dwelling is located.
3. Duties of commission. The commission shall:
A. Establish a statewide system to allow persons and public utilities to report hazards
related to seasonal residential dwellings. This system must include a hotline and online
portal for reporting downed trees, obstructions or other hazards and a process to ensure
that public utilities and municipalities are promptly informed of reported hazards;
B. Conduct a public education campaign to raise awareness among owners of seasonal
residential dwellings regarding the impact of seasonal residential dwellings on public
utilities and the importance of regular maintenance; and
C. Provide financial assistance to low-income owners of seasonal residential dwellings
to help them comply with the requirements of this section.
4. Duties of public utility. A public utility shall:
A. Maintain a list containing contact information for caretakers and responsible
persons for seasonal residential dwellings as described in subsection 2, paragraph B;
B. Develop protocols regarding repairs on portions of a utility line affected by hazards
related to seasonal residential dwellings with a focus on minimizing disruptions to
residential dwellings that are occupied at the time of the repairs and prioritizing
residential dwellings that are occupied at the time of the repairs in storm restoration
efforts; and
C. Conduct inspections at least annually of portions of a utility line with a history of
outages, particularly those with a history of issues related to seasonal residential
dwellings.
5. Funding support. The commission and a public utility shall seek federal storm
preparedness and infrastructure grants to fund the maintenance of the list under subsection
4, paragraph A and the inspections under subsection 4, paragraph C.
Page 1 - 132LR1904(01)